Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2581.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Conveyance to Ferris Land Development.(a) Authorization.--The Department of General Services, with the approval of the Department of Corrections and the Governor, may, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, grant and convey to Ferris Land Development a tract of land situate in Benner Township, Centre County, for $90,000, on terms and conditions to be established in an agreement of sale.(b) Property description.--The property to be conveyed under subsection (a) consists of approximately 9.029 acres and is described as follows:All that certain tract of land situated in Benner Township, Centre County, Pennsylvania, being a portion of Tax Parcel Number 12-005-500, as shown on a drawing entitled, "Ferris-1234567891011121314151617181920 Rockview Tract Purchase, Perimeter Survey Exhibit, A Portion of Tax Parcel 12-005-500" dated June 2, 2025, by PennTerra Engineering, Inc., being bounded and described as follows:Beginning at a rebar found, lying in a southerly R/W line of Interstate 99 Northbound Exit Ramp (S.R. 0099, Variable Width R/W) and lying in a westerly R/W line of Shiloh Road (S.R. 3041, Variable Width R/W); thence along said Shiloh Road S42°08'02"E, 58.59 feet to a rebar found, lying in a westerly R/W line of said Shiloh Road and being a northerly corner of lands owned now or formerly by Ferris Land Development, LP (Tax Parcel 37-005-025, R.B. 2330, Pg. 530); thence along said Ferris lands S51°25'40"W, 1696.88 feet to a rebar found, being a westerly corner of said Ferris lands and lying in an easterly line of lands owned now or formerly by University Area Joint Authority (Tax Parcel 37-005-024G, D.B. 431, Pg. 829); thence along said Authority lands N39°27'36"W, 365.46 feet to a rebar found, being a northerly corner of said Authority lands and lying in a southerly R/W line of said Interstate 99 Northbound Exit Ramp; thence along said Interstate 99 Northbound Exit Ramp the following seven bearings and distances: N62°47'15"E, 111.17 feet to a rebar found; thence N76°28'11"E, 202.24 feet to a rebar found; thence N09°56'40"E, 188.68 feet to a rebar found; thence N67°56'20"E, 100.00 feet to a rebar found; thence N69°08'20"E, 477.54 feet to a rebar found; thence along a curve to the left, having a chord bearing of N65°03'11"E, a chord distance of 296.52 feet, a radius of 2944.79 feet and an arc length of 296.65 feet to a rebar found; thence N62°10'02"E, 433.97 feet to a rebar found, being the place of beginning, containing 9.029 acres.BEING a portion of the same tract of land which W. Fred 20260HB2581PN3476 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Reynolds and Louise H Reynolds conveyed to the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, by, by deed dated May 7, 1912, and recorded June 21, 1912, in the Recorder's Office of Centre County, Pennsylvania in Record Book Vol. 113, page 19.This 9.029 acre tract is a portion of Tax Parcel No. 12-005-.500-,0000-, but does not adjoin the remainder of Tax Parcel Number 12-005-,500-,0000-. Upon transfer this tract will be known as Tax Parcel Number 37-5-25.(c) Easements, servitudes and rights of others.--The conveyance under subsection (a) shall be made under and subject to lawful and enforceable easements, servitudes and rights of others, including, but not limited to, streets, roadways and rights of any telephone, telegraph, water, electric, gas or pipeline companies, and under and subject to any lawful and enforceable estates or tenancies vested in third persons appearing of record, for any portion of the land or improvements erected thereon.(d) Prohibited use.--Any conveyance authorized under subsection (a) shall be made under and subject to the condition, which shall be contained in the deed of conveyance, that no portion of the property conveyed shall be used as a licensed facility, as defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to definitions), or any other similar type of facility authorized under State law. The condition shall be a covenant running with the land and shall be binding upon the grantee, its successors and assigns. If the grantee, its successors or assigns, permit any portion of the property authorized to be conveyed under subsection (a) to be used in violation of this subsection, the title shall immediately revert to and revest in the grantor.(e) Covenants, conditions and restrictions.--The Secretary 20260HB2581PN3476 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of General Services may include in the deed of conveyance any covenants, conditions or restrictions on the property as determined to be in the best interests of the Commonwealth.(f) Easements.--The Department of General Services may, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, grant any easements benefiting the property to be conveyed, or retain any easements from the property to be conveyed, as the Secretary of General Services shall determine to be necessary or appropriate.(g) Deed.--The conveyance under subsection (a) shall be made by special warranty deed to be executed by the Secretary of General Services in the name of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(h) Costs and fees.--Costs and fees incidental to the conveyance under subsection (a) shall be borne by the grantee.(i) Expiration.--If the conveyance under subsection (a) is not completed within two years after the effective date of this subsection, the authority contained under this section shall expire.(j) Proceeds.--The proceeds from the conveyance authorized under subsection (a) shall be deposited into the General Fund.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2581PN3476 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122